Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1496.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "unconscionably excessive" in section 3 of the act of October 31, 2006 (P.L.1210, No.133), known as the Price Gouging Act, is amended to read:Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Unconscionably excessive." A price is unconscionably excessive when the amount charged represents a gross disparity between the price of the consumer goods or services and the 1234567891011121314151617 price at which the consumer goods or services were sold or offered for sale within the chain of distribution in the usual course of business seven days immediately prior to the state of disaster emergency or local disaster emergency.Section 2. Section 4(a), (b) and (e) of the act are amended to read:Section 4. Price gouging prohibited.(a) Prohibition.--During and within 30 days of the termination of a state of disaster emergency declared by the Governor pursuant to the provisions of 35 Pa.C.S. § 7301(c) (relating to general authority of Governor) or a local disaster emergency declared by the local governing body pursuant to the provisions of 35 Pa.C.S. § 7501 (relating to the general authority of political subdivisions), it shall be a violation of this act for any party within the chain of distribution of consumer goods or services or both to sell or offer to sell the goods or services within the geographic region that is the subject of the declared emergency for an amount which represents an unconscionably excessive price.(b) Evidence of unconscionably excessive price.--It is prima facie evidence that a price is unconscionably excessive if, during and within 30 days of the termination of a state of disaster emergency or local disaster emergency, parties within the chain of distribution charge a price that exceeds an amount equal to or in excess of 20% of the average price at which the same or similar consumer goods or services were obtainable in the affected area during the last seven days immediately prior to the declared state of emergency.* * *(e) Notification.--A trade association, corporation, 20250HB1496PN1753 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 partnership, person or other entity may register an agent for the purpose of being notified when the Governor declares and ceases a state of emergency or when a local governing body declares and ceases a local disaster emergency. The Governor, local governing body or [his] a designee is responsible for notifying the registered agents upon the declaration and cessation of the state of emergency or local disaster emergency. Lack of notification or the failure to receive notification of the declaration and cessation of an emergency shall not be a defense with respect to any violation of this act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1496PN1753 - 3 - 1234567891011